Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.530

National 988 hotline and behavioral health crisis system coordinator. (Expires June 30, 2028.)

(1) The governor shall appoint a 988 hotline and behavioral health crisis system coordinator to provide project coordination and oversight for the implementation and administration of the 988 crisis hotline, other requirements of chapter 302, Laws of 2021, and other projects supporting the behavioral health crisis system. The coordinator shall:

(a) Oversee the collaboration between the department of health and the health care authority in their respective roles in supporting the crisis call center hubs, providing the necessary support services for 988 callers, and establishing adequate requirements and guidance for their contractors to fulfill the requirements of chapter 302, Laws of 2021;

(b) Ensure coordination and facilitate communication between stakeholders such as crisis call center hub contractors, behavioral health administrative service organizations, county authorities, other crisis hotline centers, managed care organizations, and, in collaboration with the state 911 coordination office, with 911 emergency communications systems;

(c) Review the development of adequate and consistent training for crisis call center personnel and, in coordination with the state 911 coordination office, for 911 operators with respect to their interactions with the crisis hotline center; and

(d) Coordinate implementation of other behavioral health initiatives among state agencies and educational institutions, as appropriate, including coordination of data between agencies.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2028.

[ 2023 c 454 s 8; 2021 c 302 s 107.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 302: See note following RCW 71.24.890.